Washington statutes.
RCW 36.130.005

Intent.

It is the public policy of the state to assist in making affordable housing available throughout the state. The legislature recognizes that despite ongoing efforts there is still a lack of affordable housing in many areas. The legislature also recognizes that some local governments have imposed development requirements on affordable housing developments that are not generally imposed on other housing developments. The intent of this [the] legislature is to prohibit discrimination against affordable housing developments.

[ 2008 c 118 s 1.]